test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_maanu_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - haalu: # ok MAANU
    haalu+N+Sg+Nom:  haalu
    haalu+N+Sg+Gen:  haalu
    haalu+N+Sg+Acc:  haalu
    haalu+N+Sg+Ill:  haalun
    haalu+N+Sg+Loc:  haalust
    haalu+N+Sg+Com:  haaluin
    haalu+N+Sg+Abe:  haluttáá
    haalu+N+Ess:  haallun
    haalu+N+Par:  haallud
    haalu+N+Pl+Nom:  haaluh
    haalu+N+Pl+Gen: [haalui, halui]
    haalu+N+Pl+Acc:  haaluid
    haalu+N+Pl+Ill:  haaluid
    haalu+N+Pl+Loc:  haaluin
    haalu+N+Pl+Com:  [haluiguin, haluigijn]
    haalu+N+Pl+Abe:  haluittáá

  Noun - kiilu: # ok MAANU
    kiilu+N+Sg+Nom:  kiilu
    kiilu+N+Sg+Gen:  kiilu
    kiilu+N+Sg+Acc:  kiilu
    kiilu+N+Sg+Ill:  kiilun
    kiilu+N+Sg+Loc:  kiilust
    kiilu+N+Sg+Com:  kiiluin
    kiilu+N+Sg+Abe:  kiluttáá
    kiilu+N+Ess:  kiillun
    kiilu+N+Par:  kiillud
    kiilu+N+Pl+Nom:  kiiluh
    kiilu+N+Pl+Gen:  [kiilui, kilui]
    kiilu+N+Pl+Acc:  kiiluid
    kiilu+N+Pl+Ill:  kiiluid
    kiilu+N+Pl+Loc:  kiiluin
    kiilu+N+Pl+Com:  [kiluiguin, kiluigijn]
    kiilu+N+Pl+Abe:  kiluittáá

  Noun - piiru: # ok MAANU
    piiru+N+Sg+Nom:  piiru
    piiru+N+Sg+Gen:  piiru
    piiru+N+Sg+Acc:  piiru
    piiru+N+Sg+Ill:  piirun
    piiru+N+Sg+Loc:  piirust
    piiru+N+Sg+Com:  piiruin
    piiru+N+Sg+Abe:  piruttáá
    piiru+N+Ess:  piirrun
    piiru+N+Par:  piirrud
    piiru+N+Pl+Nom:  piiruh
    piiru+N+Pl+Gen: [piirui, pirui]
    piiru+N+Pl+Acc:  piiruid
    piiru+N+Pl+Ill:  piiruid
    piiru+N+Pl+Loc:  piiruin
    piiru+N+Pl+Com:  [piruiguin, piruigijn]
    piiru+N+Pl+Abe:  piruittáá

  Noun - niisu: # ok MAANU
    niisu+N+Sg+Nom:  niisu
    niisu+N+Sg+Gen:  niisu
    niisu+N+Sg+Acc:  niisu
    niisu+N+Sg+Ill:  niisun
    niisu+N+Sg+Loc:  niisust
    niisu+N+Sg+Com:  niisuin
    niisu+N+Sg+Abe:  nisuttáá
    niisu+N+Ess:  niissun
    niisu+N+Par:  niissud
    niisu+N+Pl+Nom:  niisuh
    niisu+N+Pl+Gen: [niisui, nisui]
    niisu+N+Pl+Acc:  niisuid
    niisu+N+Pl+Ill:  niisuid
    niisu+N+Pl+Loc:  niisuin
    niisu+N+Pl+Com:  [nisuiguin, nisuigijn]
    niisu+N+Pl+Abe:  nisuittáá

  Noun - máánu: # ok MAANU
    máánu+N+Sg+Nom:  máánu
    máánu+N+Sg+Gen:  máánu
    máánu+N+Sg+Acc:  máánu
    máánu+N+Sg+Ill:  máánun
    máánu+N+Sg+Loc:  máánust
    máánu+N+Sg+Com:  máánuin
    máánu+N+Sg+Abe:  mánuttáá
    máánu+N+Ess:  máánnun
    máánu+N+Par:  máánnud
    máánu+N+Pl+Nom:  máánuh
    máánu+N+Pl+Gen:  [máánui, mánui]
    máánu+N+Pl+Acc:  máánuid
    máánu+N+Pl+Ill:  máánuid
    máánu+N+Pl+Loc:  máánuin
    máánu+N+Pl+Com:  [mánuiguin, mánuigijn]
    máánu+N+Pl+Abe:  mánuittáá

  Noun - sááhá: # ok
    sááhá+N+Sg+Nom:  sááhá
    sááhá+N+Sg+Gen:  sááhá
    sááhá+N+Sg+Acc: sááhá
    sááhá+N+Sg+Ill:  sááhán
    sááhá+N+Sg+Loc:  sááhást
    sááhá+N+Sg+Com:  sááháin
    sááhá+N+Sg+Abe:  sáháttáá
    sááhá+N+Ess:  sááhhán
    sááhá+N+Par: sááhhád
    sááhá+N+Pl+Nom:  sááháh
    sááhá+N+Pl+Gen:  [sááhái, sáhái]
    sááhá+N+Pl+Acc:  sááháid
    sááhá+N+Pl+Ill:  sááháid
    sááhá+N+Pl+Loc:  sááháin
    sááhá+N+Pl+Com:  [sáháiguin, sáháigijn]
    sááhá+N+Pl+Abe:  sáháittáá
